Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.370

Child abuse and neglect—Intensive training.

Each year the criminal justice training commission shall offer an intensive training session on investigation of child abuse and neglect. The training shall focus on the investigative duties of law enforcement established under chapter 26.44 RCW with particular emphasis placed on child interview techniques to increase the accuracy of statements taken from children and decrease the need for additional interviews.

[ 1997 c 351 s 12.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1997 c 351: See notes following RCW 43.101.200.